phon.xfst
define posSym @"pos-symbols.a";
define intSym @"intermediate-symbols.a";
define analysisSym @"analysis-symbols.a";
define consonant  @"consonant.a";
define vowel  @"vowel.a";

define R1       [Ⅰ|I|ⅰ|i];
define R5       [v|ⅴ|V|Ⅴ];
define R10      [X|Ⅹ|x|ⅹ];
define R50      [L|Ⅼ|l|ⅼ];
define R100     [C|Ⅽ|c|ⅽ];
define R500     [D|Ⅾ|d|ⅾ];
define R1000    [M|Ⅿ|m|ⅿ];
define digit    [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9];
define nonzero  digit - %0;
define numArabic ⟨Num⟩ [⟨ara⟩|⟨time⟩|⟨date⟩];
define numRoman  ⟨Num⟩ ⟨rom⟩;

define phonetize [⟪neg⟫|⟪ques⟫] -> 0
    ,, [⟪onom⟫|⟪emoticon⟫] -> 0
    ,, [⟪unit⟫|⟪pers⟫|⟪loc⟫|⟪nation⟫] -> 0
    ,, [⟪dem⟫|⟪pers⟫|⟪loc⟫|⟪refl⟫] -> 0
    ,, [⟪1s⟫|⟪2s⟫|⟪3s⟫|⟪1p⟫|⟪2p⟫|⟪3p⟫] -> 0
    ,, [⟪ppadj⟫|⟪ablC⟫|⟪accC⟫|⟪datC⟫|⟪genC⟫|⟪insC⟫|⟪liC⟫|⟪nomC⟫|⟪numC⟫] -> 0
    ,, ⟪part⟫ -> 0
    ,, [⟪def⟫|⟪indef⟫] -> 0
    ,, [⟪adv⟫|⟪coo⟫|⟪sub⟫] -> 0
    ,, ⟪propn⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪time⟫ -> 0
    ,, ⟪family⟫ -> 0
    ,, [..] (->)  ⟪compn⟫ ⟪MB⟫ || ⟪compn⟫ intSym* ⟨N⟩ [⟨pl⟩|⟨lik⟩] _
   .o. ⟪compn⟫ ->  0         || _ intSym* ⟨N⟩ [⟨pl⟩|⟨lik⟩] ⟪compn⟫ ⟪MB⟫
    ,, [⟨def⟩|⟨indef⟩] -> 0
!
    ,, [⟨1s⟩|⟨1p⟩|⟨2s⟩|⟨2p⟩|⟨3s⟩|⟨3p⟩] -> 0 || ⟨Pron⟩ _
! insert 'inflectional group' boundary
    ,, [..] -> ⟪IGB⟫  || posSym ?* _ ? posSym
! noun inflections
   .o. ⟪compn⟫ -> ⟪compn⟫ ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫ 
    ,, ⟨pl⟩ -> l ⟪A⟫ r
    ,, ⟨sg⟩ -> 0
    ,, ⟨p1s⟩  -> ⟪bI⟫ m
    ,, ⟨p2s⟩  -> ⟪bI⟫ n
    ,, ⟨p3s⟩  -> ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨p1p⟩  -> ⟪bI⟫ m ⟪I⟫ z
    ,, ⟨p2p⟩  -> ⟪bI⟫ n ⟪I⟫ z
    ,, ⟨p3p⟩  -> l ⟪A⟫ r ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨p%0x⟩ -> 0
    ,, ⟨nom⟩ -> 0
    ,, ⟨acc⟩ -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨dat⟩ -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨abl⟩ -> ⟪D⟫ ⟪A⟫ n
    ,, ⟨loc⟩ -> ⟪D⟫ ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨gen⟩ -> ⟪bn⟫ ⟪I⟫ n
    ,, ⟨ins⟩ -> ⟪by⟫ l ⟪NS⟫ ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨siz⟩ -> s ⟪I⟫ z
    ,, ⟨li⟩  -> l ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨lik⟩ -> l ⟪I⟫ ⟪k⟫
    ,, ⟨ce⟩  -> ⟪C⟫ ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨ci⟩  -> ⟪C⟫ ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨sel⟩ -> s ⟪A⟫ l
    ,, ⟨ki⟩ -> k i
    ,, ⟨le⟩ -> l ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨les⟩ -> l ⟪A⟫ ş
    ,, ⟨len⟩ -> l ⟪A⟫ n
    ,, ⟨dim⟩ -> [ ⟪C⟫ ⟪I⟫ ⟪k⟫   ! TODO: (?) add (A/I)CIK
                 |⟪C⟫ ⟪A⟫ ⟪k⟫ 
                 |⟪C⟫ ⟪A⟫ ğ ⟪I⟫ z]
    ,, ⟨imsi⟩ -> ⟪bI⟫ m s ⟪I⟫ || intSyme* _
! numbers
    ,, ⟨dist⟩ -> (⟪apos⟫) ⟪bş⟫ ⟪A⟫ r
    ,, ⟨dist⟩ -> %. || digit ⟨Num⟩ ⟨ara⟩ _ 
    ,, ⟨ord⟩  -> (⟪apos⟫) ⟪bI⟫ n c ⟪I⟫
! verbs
    ,, ⟨rfl⟩      -> ⟪bI⟫ n
    ,, ⟨rcp⟩      -> ⟪bI⟫ ş
    ,, ⟨pass⟩     -> ⟪pass⟫ ! replaced afeter buff. deletion
    ,, ⟨caus⟩     -> ⟪A⟫ r || .#. ?* ⟪causAr⟫ \[⟨caus⟩]* ⟨V⟩  _
    ,, ⟨caus⟩     -> ⟪A⟫ t || .#. ?* ⟪causAt⟫ \[⟨caus⟩]* ⟨V⟩  _
    ,, ⟨caus⟩     -> ⟪A⟫ r t || .#. ?* ⟪causArt⟫ \[⟨caus⟩]* ⟨V⟩ _
    ,, ⟨caus⟩     -> ⟪I⟫ r || .#. ?* ⟪causIr⟫ \[⟨caus⟩]* ⟨V⟩  _
    ,, ⟨caus⟩     -> ⟪I⟫ t || .#. ?* ⟪causIt⟫ \[⟨caus⟩]* ⟨V⟩  _
    ,, ⟨caus⟩     -> ⟪D⟫ ⟪I⟫ r || .#. ?* ⟪causDir⟫ \[⟨caus⟩]* ⟨V⟩  _
    ,, ⟨aor⟩     -> ⟪bA⟫ r || ⟪aorAr⟫ intSym* ⟨V⟩ _
    ,, ⟨aor⟩     -> ⟪bI⟫ r || .#. [\⟪aorAr⟫]* ⟨V⟩ _ , \[⟨V⟩|⟨neg⟩] _
    ,, ⟨aor⟩     -> z || ⟨neg⟩ _ \[⟨1s⟩|⟨1p⟩]
    ,, ⟨aor⟩     -> 0 || ⟨neg⟩ _ [⟨1s⟩|⟨1p⟩]
    ,, [⟪rcp⟫|⟪rfl⟫|⟪causNone⟫|⟪causAr⟫|⟪causArt⟫|⟪causAt⟫|
        ⟪causDir⟫|⟪causIr⟫|⟪causIt⟫|⟪aorAr⟫] -> 0
    ,, ⟨abil⟩    -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫       || _ [⟨neg⟩|"⟨cv.meden⟩"|"⟨cv.meksizin⟩"]
    ,, ⟨abil⟩    -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ b i l || _ \[⟨neg⟩|"⟨cv.meden⟩"|"⟨cv.meksizin⟩"]
    ,, ⟨iver⟩    -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ v e r
    ,, ⟨adur⟩    -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ d u r
    ,, ⟨agel⟩    -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ g e l
    ,, ⟨agor⟩    -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ g ö r
    ,, ⟨akal⟩    -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ k a l
    ,, ⟨ayaz⟩    -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ y a z
    ,, ⟨neg⟩     -> m ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨cond⟩    -> s ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨evid⟩    -> m ⟪I⟫ ş
    ,, ⟨fut⟩     -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ c ⟪A⟫ ⟪k⟫
    ,, ⟨imp⟩     -> 0
    ,, ⟨prs⟩     -> 0
    ,, ⟨obl⟩     -> m ⟪A⟫ l ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨opt⟩     -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ ! || _ \[⟨3s⟩|⟨3p⟩]
!    ,, ⟨opt⟩     -> 0        || _ [⟨3s⟩|⟨3p⟩]
    ,, ⟨past⟩    -> ⟪D⟫ ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨prog%.yor⟩ -> ⟪bI⟫ y o r
    ,, ⟨prog%.mekte⟩ -> m ⟪A⟫ k t ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨cpl⟩     -> ⟪by⟫ || _ (⟨V⟩) [⟨past⟩|⟨evid⟩|⟨cond⟩|"⟨cv.ken⟩"]
    ,, ⟨cpl⟩     -> 0 || _  \[⟨V⟩|⟨past⟩|⟨evid⟩|⟨cond⟩|"⟨cv.ken⟩"]
    ,, ⟨cpl⟩     -> 0 || _  ⟨V⟩ \[⟨past⟩|⟨evid⟩|⟨cond⟩|"⟨cv.ken⟩"]
    ,, ⟨1s⟩      -> m,
       ⟨2s⟩      -> n,
       ⟨3s⟩      -> 0,
       ⟨1p⟩      -> k,
       ⟨2p⟩      -> n ⟪I⟫ z || [⟨past⟩|⟨cond⟩] _
    ,, ⟨1s⟩      -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ m || [⟨prog%.mekte⟩|⟨obl⟩|⟨Q⟩] _
    ,, ⟨1s⟩      -> ⟪bI⟫ m || [⟨aor⟩|⟨evid⟩|⟨fut⟩|⟨prog%.yor⟩|⟨cv%.ken⟩] _
    ,, ⟨2s⟩       -> s ⟪I⟫ n,
       ⟨3s⟩       -> 0,
       ⟨1p⟩       -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ z,
       ⟨2p⟩       -> s ⟪I⟫ n ⟪I⟫ z 
            || [⟨aor⟩|⟨evid⟩|⟨fut⟩|⟨obl⟩|⟨prog%.yor⟩|⟨prog%.mekte⟩
               |⟨cv%.ken⟩|⟨Q⟩|⟨q⟩] _
    ,, ⟨1s⟩       -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ m,
       ⟨2s⟩       -> s ⟪I⟫ n,
       ⟨3s⟩       -> 0,
       ⟨1p⟩       -> l ⟪I⟫ m,
       ⟨2p⟩       -> s ⟪I⟫ n ⟪I⟫ z || ⟨opt⟩ _
    ,, ⟨1s⟩       -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ m,
       ⟨2s⟩       -> s ⟪I⟫ n,
       ⟨3s⟩       -> 0,
       ⟨1p⟩       -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ z,
       ⟨2p⟩       -> s ⟪I⟫ n ⟪I⟫ z || ⟨cpl⟩ (⟨V⟩) _,
                                [⟨nom⟩|⟨dat⟩|⟨abl⟩|⟨loc⟩|⟨gen⟩|⟨ins⟩
                                |⟨siz⟩|⟨li⟩|⟨lik⟩|⟨ci⟩|⟨ce⟩]  _ ⟨cpl⟩
    ,, ⟨2s⟩       -> s ⟪A⟫ n ⟪A⟫,
       ⟨2p⟩       -> s ⟪A⟫ n ⟪I⟫ z ⟪A⟫ || ⟨prs⟩ _
    ,, ⟨2s⟩       -> 0,
       ⟨3s⟩       -> s ⟪I⟫ n,
       ⟨2p⟩       -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ n,
       ⟨2p⟩       -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ n ⟪I⟫ z,
       ⟨3p⟩       -> s ⟪I⟫ n l ⟪A⟫ r || ⟨imp⟩ _
    ,, ⟨3p⟩       -> l ⟪A⟫ r || \⟨imp⟩ _
    ,, ⟨dir⟩      -> ⟪D⟫ ⟪I⟫ r
    ,, ⟨q⟩        -> ⟪mispc⟫ m ⟪I⟫
! this compositon is only to get foma compile without consuming a lot
! of memory. It can be completely paralelized
    ,, [..]       -> ⟪MB⟫ || analysisSym  _
   .o. "⟨vn.me⟩"        -> m ⟪A⟫
    ,, "⟨vn.mek⟩"       -> m ⟪A⟫ ⟪K⟫
    ,, "⟨vn.yis⟩"       -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ ş
    ,, "⟨part.pres⟩"    -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ n
    ,, "⟨part.past⟩"    -> ⟪D⟫ ⟪I⟫ ⟪k⟫
    ,, "⟨part.fut⟩"     -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ c ⟪A⟫ ⟪k⟫
    ,, "⟨part.esi⟩"     -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ s ⟪I⟫
    ,, "⟨part.ici⟩"     -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ c ⟪I⟫
    ,, "⟨cv.cesine⟩"    -> ⟪C⟫ ⟪A⟫ s ⟪I⟫ n ⟪A⟫
    ,, "⟨cv.ken⟩"       -> k e n
    ,, "⟨cv.dikce⟩"     -> ⟪D⟫ ⟪I⟫ k ⟪C⟫ ⟪A⟫
    ,, "⟨cv.eli⟩"       -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ l ⟪I⟫
    ,, "⟨cv.erek⟩"      -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ r ⟪A⟫ k
    ,, "⟨cv.erek⟩"      -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ r ⟪A⟫ k t ⟪A⟫ n ! colloquial
    ,, "⟨cv.esiye⟩"     -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫ s ⟪I⟫ y ⟪A⟫
    ,, "⟨cv.inceye⟩"    -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ n c ⟪A⟫ y ⟪A⟫
    ,, "⟨cv.ince⟩"      -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ n c ⟪A⟫
    ,, "⟨cv.ip⟩"        -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫ p
    ,, "⟨cv.meden⟩"     -> m ⟪A⟫ d ⟪A⟫ n
    ,, "⟨cv.meden⟩"     -> m ⟪A⟫ z d ⟪A⟫ n
    ,, "⟨cv.meksizin⟩"  -> m ⟪A⟫ k s ⟪I⟫ z ⟪I⟫ n
    ,, "⟨cv.ye⟩"        -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫
    ,, [..]             -> ⟪mredup⟫ || .#. (ˈ) _ \ˈ ?* ⟨mredup⟩
    ,, ⟨mredup⟩         -> 0
    ,, [..]       -> ⟪MB⟫ || analysisSym  _
!
! Add the default silent front/unronded vowel
! to abbreviations which do not have any vowel, or any silent
! letters added in the lexicon.
! The second rule inserts an optional dot `.' if there isn't one
! already.
   .o. [..] -> ⟪sFUV⟫ || .#. consonant+ _ intSym* ⟪abbr⟫
    ,, [..] (->) %.   || \[%.] _ intSym* ⟪abbr⟫ [⟪MB⟫|⟪IGB⟫|posSym]+ .#.
    ,, ⟪abbr⟫ -> 0
! replace apostrophe with an intermediate symbol
    ,, ⟨apos⟩     -> ⟪apos⟫
!
! silent vowel insertion for numbers and 
!
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sBRV⟫ ⟪sVC⟫
                || nonzero %0^{12,14} / ⟪tSep⟫   _ numArabic, ! trilyon
                   nonzero %0^{6,8}   / ⟪tSep⟫   _ numArabic, ! milyon
                   [¹|1|3] %0                _ numArabic, ! 10,30
                   9                       _ numArabic,
                   R1   R10                _ numRoman,  ! 9
                   [\[R50|R10|R1]|.#.] R10^{1,3} _ numRoman,  ! 10,30
                   [Ⅸ|ⅸ]                   _ numRoman   ! 9
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sBUV⟫ ⟪sVC⟫ 
                || nonzero %0^{9,11}  / ⟪tSep⟫   _ numArabic, ! milyar
                   [\[digit|⟪tSep⟫]|.#.] %0+     _ numArabic, ! 0, 00, a00
                   9 %0                    _ numArabic, ! doksan
                   R10 R100                _ numRoman ! 90
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sFUV⟫ ⟪sVC⟫ 
                || nonzero %0^{3,5}   / ⟪tSep⟫   _ numArabic, ! bin
                   8 %0                    _ numArabic, ! seksen
                   1                       _ numArabic,
                   8                       _ numArabic,
                   [Ⅷ|ⅷ|Ⅺ]                 _ numRoman, ! 8
                   R5 R1^3                 _ numRoman, ! 8
                   [\[R5|R1]|.#.] R1       _ numRoman, ! 1
                   R50 R10^3               _ numRoman, ! 80
                   [\R100|.#.] R1000       _ numRoman  ! 1000
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sFRV⟫ ⟪sVC⟫ 
                || nonzero %0^2            _ numArabic,     ! yüz
                   [\[R10|R1]|.#.] R100    _ numRoman, ! 100
                   R500                    _ numRoman, ! 500
                   R100 R1000              _ numRoman  ! 900
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sBUV⟫ ⟪sUC⟫
                || 4 %0                    _ numArabic,
                   6 %0                    _ numArabic,
                   R10 R50                 _ numRoman, ! 40
                   R50 R10                 _ numRoman  ! 60
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sFUV⟫ ⟪sUC⟫ 
                || 7 %0                    _ numArabic,
                   5                       _ numArabic,
                   [\[R1]|.#.] R5          _ numRoman, ! 5
                   R50 R10^2               _ numRoman  ! 70
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sFRV⟫ ⟪sUC⟫
                || [³|3|4|¼|¾]             _ numArabic,
                   [Ⅲ|ⅲ|Ⅳ|ⅳ]               _ numRoman, ! 3,4
                   R1 R5                   _ numRoman, ! 4
                   [\R5|.#.] R1^{3,4}      _ numRoman  ! 3,4
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sBUV⟫
                || 6                       _ numArabic,
                   R5 R1                   _ numRoman, ! 6
                   [Ⅵ|ⅵ]                   _ numRoman  ! 6
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sFUV⟫
                || [²|2|5] %0              _ numArabic,
                   [2|½|7]                 _ numArabic,
                   [\R10|.#.] R50          _ numRoman, ! 50
                   [\R50|.#.] R10^2        _ numRoman, ! 20
                   [\R1|.#.] R1^2          _ numRoman, ! 2,7
                   [Ⅱ|ⅱ|Ⅶ|ⅶ|Ⅻ|ⅻ]           _ numRoman  ! 2,7,12
! decimal / thousand separator replacement
    ,, [⟨ara⟩|⟨rom⟩|⟨date⟩|⟨time⟩] -> 0
    ,, ⟪tSep⟫ -> "."|","
    ,, ⟪dSep⟫ -> "."|","
    ,, ⟪DB⟫ (->) " " || _ intSym* \⟨Num⟩ !TODO: double check
    ,, ⟪DB⟫ -> 0
! realization of causative and aorist (except the exceptions above)
! depnds on vowel harmony and buffer deletion, we replace them here 
! with an intermediate symbol, and process it later.
    ,, ⟨caus⟩     -> ⟪caus⟫
;



regex phonetize
  .o. posSym -> ⟪RB⟫ || .#. [\posSym]+ _
  .o. posSym -> 0
;
